Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2080.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5611YH (1) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2080 Section 1. Section 97B.52A, subsection 1, paragraph c, 1 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended by adding the following 2 new subparagraph division: 3 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH DIVISION . (e) For a member whose first 4 month of entitlement is July 2026 or later, the member may 5 return to covered employment as school district support staff 6 for a covered employer after receiving one month of retirement 7 benefits. 8